Washington statutes.
RCW 23.95.265

Waiver of penalty fees.

The secretary of state may, where exigent or mitigating circumstances are presented, waive penalty fees due from any entity previously in good standing which would otherwise be penalized or lose its active status. An entity desiring to seek relief under this section must, within fifteen days of discovery of the missed filing or lapse, notify the secretary of state as provided in rule. The notification must include the name and mailing address of the entity, the governor or other entity official to whom correspondence should be sent, and a statement under oath by a governor or other entity official, setting forth the nature of the missed filing or lapse, the circumstances giving rise to the missed filing or lapse, and the relief sought. If the secretary of state is satisfied that sufficient exigent or mitigating circumstances exist, that the entity has demonstrated good faith and a reasonable attempt to comply with the applicable statutes of this state, the secretary of state may issue an order allowing relief from the penalty. If the secretary of state determines the request does not comply with the requirements for relief, the secretary of state shall deny the relief and state the reasons for the denial. Any denial of relief by the secretary of state is not reviewable notwithstanding the provisions of chapter 34.05 RCW.

[ 2020 c 57 s 31; 2015 c 176 s 1214.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.